Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.220

School locker searches—No expectation of privacy.

No right nor expectation of privacy exists for any student as to the use of any locker issued or assigned to a student by a school and the locker shall be subject to search for illegal drugs, weapons, and contraband as provided in RCW 28A.600.210 through 28A.600.240.

[ 1990 c 33 s 503; 1989 c 271 s 245. Formerly RCW 28A.67.310.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 271: See note following RCW 9.94A.510.